Alabama, session 2026rs, HB636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 3 of Act 1984-549, 1984 Regular
Session (Acts 1984, p. 1174), is amended to read as follows:
"Section 3. The provisions of this act are severable.
If any part of this act is declared invalid or
unconstitutional, such declaration shall not affect the part
which remains When the person holding the office of circuit
clerk on January 1, 2026, vacates such office, Section 1 of
this act shall be repealed immediately and shall have no
effect on future office holders."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 1

1, 2026.
HB636 Enrolled








________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 31-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed



Page 2